Tennessee, session 114, HB0026.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
HB0026
000534
- 1 -

SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 29, Chapter 34, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Unborn Child Protection Act
of 2025."
(b) A person or entity, including, but not limited to, a manufacturer, distributor,
seller, or reseller, of an abortion-inducing drug shall not mail or deliver an abortion-
inducing drug into this state.
(c) As used in this section, "abortion-inducing drug":
(1) Means a drug or medication that is intended to be used, and is used,
to terminate the life of an unborn child;
(2) Includes mifepristone, misoprostol, mifeprex (RU-486), when
possessed or distributed for the purpose of terminating the life of an unborn child;
and
(3) Does not include a drug or medication that is possessed or distributed
for a purpose that does not include the termination of the life of an unborn child,
such as misoprostol that is possessed or distributed for the purpose of treating a
stomach ulcer.
(d) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a person or entity who mails or
delivers an abortion-inducing drug into this state and the mailing or delivery results in the
death of an unborn child is strictly liable in the amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000)
in damages for the death of the unborn child.
(e) Any action brought to recover such damages must proceed as provided in §
20-5-106.
(f) An action brought pursuant to subsection (d) must be commenced within five
(5) years of the death of the unborn child.
- 2 - 000534

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000534